Illinois, session 104th, HB3610.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Litter Control Act is amended by changing 5Section 3 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 105/3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 86-3)7    Sec. 3. As used in this Act, unless the context otherwise 8requires: 9    (a) "Litter" means any discarded, used or unconsumed 10substance or waste. "Litter" may include, but is not limited 11to, any garbage, trash, refuse, cigarettes, debris, rubbish, 12grass clippings or other lawn or garden waste, newspaper, 13magazines, glass, metal, plastic or paper containers or other 14packaging construction material, abandoned vehicle (as defined 15in the Illinois Vehicle Code), motor vehicle parts, furniture, 16oil, carcass of a dead animal, animal manure, any nauseous or 17offensive matter of any kind, any object likely to injure any 18person or create a traffic hazard, potentially infectious 19medical waste as defined in Section 3.360 of the Environmental 20Protection Act, or anything else of an unsightly or unsanitary 21nature, which has been discarded, abandoned or otherwise 22disposed of improperly.23    (b) "Motor vehicle" has the meaning ascribed to that term   HB3610- 2 -LRB104 09544 BDA 19607 b1in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.2    (c) "Person" means any individual, partnership, 3copartnership, firm, company, corporation, association, joint 4stock company, trust, estate, or any other legal entity, or 5their legal representative, agent or assigns.6(Source: P.A. 98-483, eff. 1-1-14.)